Washington statutes.
RCW 36.135.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Capital facilities plan" means a capital facilities plan required under chapter 36.70A RCW.

(2) "Local government" means cities, towns, counties, special purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state, excluding school districts and port districts.

(3) "Public works project" means a project of a local government for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads, bridges, water systems, or storm and sanitary sewage systems and solid waste facilities, including recycling facilities.

[ 2009 c 45 s 1.]